Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.557

Coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund.

The coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. All federal moneys received by the state pursuant to the American rescue plan act of 2021, state fiscal recovery fund, P.L. 117-2, subtitle M, section 9901, must be deposited in the account. The legislature may appropriate from the account only for the purposes authorized in that section of the federal act.

[ 2022 c 157 s 6. Prior: 2021 c 334 s 1903.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.